Louisiana, session 2026, HB1040.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:1105.1(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1105.1. Board of commissioners; appointment; terms
A. The Central Louisiana Juvenile Detention Center Authority shall be is
governed by a commission which shall control, administer, and manage its the affairs
of the authority. The commission shall be composed of a board of seven
commissioners. There shall be one One commissioner shall be appointed from each
of the seven parishes within the territory of the authority and each commissioner
shall be a qualified elector and who is domiciled in the parish for which he is
appointed. They Each commissioner shall be appointed for terms a term of four
years, as follows:
(1) Two commissioners shall be appointed by the judges exercising juvenile
jurisdiction within the participating parishes.
(2) Two commissioners shall be appointed by the sheriffs of the participating
parishes.
(3) One commissioner shall be appointed by the chiefs of police of
municipalities within the participating parishes.
(4) Two commissioners shall be appointed by the district attorneys with
jurisdiction in the participating parishes.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1040 ENROLLED
(1) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing within Avoyelles Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and
district attorney for the Twelfth Judicial District and the sheriff of Avoyelles Parish
for an initial term of four years.
(2) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing in Catahoula Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and district
attorney for the Seventh Judicial District and the sheriff of Catahoula Parish for an
initial term of four years.
(3) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing in Concordia Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and district
attorney for the Seventh Judicial District and the sheriff of Concordia Parish for an
initial term of four years.
(4) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing within Grant Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and district
attorney of the Thirty-Fifth Judicial District and the sheriff of Grant Parish for an
initial term of four years.
(5) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing in LaSalle Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and district
attorney for the Twenty-Eighth Judicial District and the sheriff of LaSalle Parish for
an initial term of four years.
(6) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing in Vernon Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and district
attorney for the Thirtieth Judicial District and the sheriff of Vernon Parish for an
initial term of four years.
(7) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing within Winn Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and district
attorney for the Eighth Judicial District and the sheriff of Winn Parish for an initial
term of four years.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1040 ENROLLED
Section 2. The appointment of commissioners for a four-year term provided for in
R.S. 15:1105.1(A), as amended and reenacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall begin on August
1, 2026.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.